Contents/Resources/Wolfram Player.app/Contents/SystemFiles/Components/SpellingData/SpellingDictionaries/TechTerms.aff
FLAG num
SFX 1518 N 1
SFX 1518 0 liter .

SFX 1519 N 1
SFX 1519 0 Literal .

SFX 1520 N 1
SFX 1520 0 liters .

SFX 1521 N 1
SFX 1521 0 lization .

SFX 1522 N 1
SFX 1522 0 llionth .

SFX 1523 N 1
SFX 1523 0 llohedron .

SFX 1524 N 1
SFX 1524 0 Load .

SFX 1525 N 1
SFX 1525 0 Location .

SFX 1526 N 1
SFX 1526 0 LocusPlot .

SFX 1527 N 1
SFX 1527 0 Log .

SFX 1528 N 1
SFX 1528 0 Long .

SFX 1529 N 1
SFX 1529 0 Longitude .

SFX 1530 N 1
SFX 1530 0 lternating .

SFX 1531 N 1
SFX 1531 0 lumen .

SFX 1532 N 1
SFX 1532 0 lumens .

SFX 1533 N 1
SFX 1533 0 lux .

SFX 1534 N 1
SFX 1534 0 ly .

SFX 1535 N 1
SFX 1535 0 lyan .

SFX 1536 N 1
SFX 1536 0 M .

SFX 1537 N 1
SFX 1537 0 Madder .

SFX 1538 N 1
SFX 1538 0 Magnitude .

SFX 1539 N 1
SFX 1539 0 Major .

SFX 1540 N 1
SFX 1540 0 MakehamDistribution .

SFX 1541 N 1
SFX 1541 0 Manager .

SFX 1542 N 1
SFX 1542 0 ManagerEnabled .

SFX 1543 N 1
SFX 1543 0 mann .

SFX 1544 N 1
SFX 1544 0 Map .

SFX 1545 N 1
SFX 1545 0 MapThread .

SFX 1546 N 1
SFX 1546 0 Margins .

SFX 1547 N 1
SFX 1547 0 Marker .

SFX 1548 N 1
SFX 1548 0 Markers .

SFX 1549 N 1
SFX 1549 0 MarkersStyle .

SFX 1550 N 1
SFX 1550 0 Marks .

SFX 1551 N 1
SFX 1551 0 Marquardt .

SFX 1552 N 1
SFX 1552 0 Mass .

SFX 1553 N 1
SFX 1553 0 Match .

SFX 1554 N 1
SFX 1554 0 MatchingColor .

SFX 1555 N 1
SFX 1555 0 MatchQ .

SFX 1556 N 1
SFX 1556 0 math .

SFX 1557 N 1
SFX 1557 0 MathEditExpression .

SFX 1558 N 1
SFX 1558 0 Matrix .

SFX 1559 N 1
SFX 1559 0 MatrixDetRatio .

SFX 1560 N 1
SFX 1560 0 MatrixDistribution .

SFX 1561 N 1
SFX 1561 0 MatrixMLE .

SFX 1562 N 1
SFX 1562 0 MatrixOfSampleMean .

SFX 1563 N 1
SFX 1563 0 MatrixQ .

SFX 1564 N 1
SFX 1564 0 MaxFraction .

SFX 1565 N 1
SFX 1565 0 Maximum .

SFX 1566 N 1
SFX 1566 0 MaximumFlow .

SFX 1567 N 1
SFX 1567 0 MaxSize .

SFX 1568 N 1
SFX 1568 0 MaxValue .

SFX 1569 N 1
SFX 1569 0 MeanSquare .

SFX 1570 N 1
SFX 1570 0 Measure .

SFX 1571 N 1
SFX 1571 0 Measurement .

SFX 1572 N 1
SFX 1572 0 Median .

SFX 1573 N 1
SFX 1573 0 Medium .

SFX 1574 N 1
SFX 1574 0 MellinTransform .

SFX 1575 N 1
SFX 1575 0 Member .

SFX 1576 N 1
SFX 1576 0 MemberFunction .

SFX 1577 N 1
SFX 1577 0 MemberQ .

SFX 1578 N 1
SFX 1578 0 Memory .

SFX 1579 N 1
SFX 1579 0 Menu .

SFX 1580 N 1
SFX 1580 0 MenuListing .

SFX 1581 N 1
SFX 1581 0 MenusPacket .

SFX 1582 N 1
SFX 1582 0 MenuStyle .

SFX 1583 N 1
SFX 1583 0 Mesh .

SFX 1584 N 1
SFX 1584 0 MeshDefects .

SFX 1585 N 1
SFX 1585 0 Messages .

SFX 1586 N 1
SFX 1586 0 meter .

SFX 1587 N 1
SFX 1587 0 meters .

SFX 1588 N 1
SFX 1588 0 Method .

SFX 1589 N 1
SFX 1589 0 MinHeight .

SFX 1590 N 1
SFX 1590 0 Minimum .

SFX 1591 N 1
SFX 1591 0 MinimumCostFlow .

SFX 1592 N 1
SFX 1592 0 MinimumCut .

SFX 1593 N 1
SFX 1593 0 Minor .

SFX 1594 N 1
SFX 1594 0 MinSize .

SFX 1595 N 1
SFX 1595 0 Minus .

SFX 1596 N 1
SFX 1596 0 MinValue .

SFX 1597 N 1
SFX 1597 0 MLE .

SFX 1598 N 1
SFX 1598 0 Mnemonic .

SFX 1599 N 1
SFX 1599 0 mo .

SFX 1600 N 1
SFX 1600 0 Mod .

SFX 1601 N 1
SFX 1601 0 Model .

SFX 1602 N 1
SFX 1602 0 ModelFit .

SFX 1603 N 1
SFX 1603 0 Modify .

SFX 1604 N 1
SFX 1604 0 Module .

SFX 1605 N 1
SFX 1605 0 ModuleBox .

SFX 1606 N 1
SFX 1606 0 ModuleBoxOptions .

SFX 1607 N 1
SFX 1607 0 ModuleParent .

SFX 1608 N 1
SFX 1608 0 ModuleValues .

SFX 1609 N 1
SFX 1609 0 molar .

SFX 1610 N 1
SFX 1610 0 mole .

SFX 1611 N 1
SFX 1611 0 MoleculeSubstructure .

SFX 1612 N 1
SFX 1612 0 moles .

SFX 1613 N 1
SFX 1613 0 Moment .

SFX 1614 N 1
SFX 1614 0 MomentGeneratingFunction .

SFX 1615 N 1
SFX 1615 0 MonthName .

SFX 1616 N 1
SFX 1616 0 Morse .

SFX 1617 N 1
SFX 1617 0 mos .

SFX 1618 N 1
SFX 1618 0 MostLayer .

SFX 1619 N 1
SFX 1619 0 Mu .

SFX 1620 N 1
SFX 1620 0 MultinomialDistribution .

SFX 1621 N 1
SFX 1621 0 Multiplier .

SFX 1622 N 1
SFX 1622 0 Multipliers .

SFX 1623 N 1
SFX 1623 0 n .

SFX 1624 N 1
SFX 1624 0 Name .

SFX 1625 N 1
SFX 1625 0 NameDepth .

SFX 1626 N 1
SFX 1626 0 NameDialogSettings .

SFX 1627 N 1
SFX 1627 0 NameDrop .

SFX 1628 N 1
SFX 1628 0 NameFormat .

SFX 1629 N 1
SFX 1629 0 NameForms .

SFX 1630 N 1
SFX 1630 0 NameJoin .

SFX 1631 N 1
SFX 1631 0 NamePacket .

SFX 1632 N 1
SFX 1632 0 Names .

SFX 1633 N 1
SFX 1633 0 nameSeparator .

SFX 1634 N 1
SFX 1634 0 NameSetter .

SFX 1635 N 1
SFX 1635 0 Namespace .

SFX 1636 N 1
SFX 1636 0 NameSplit .

SFX 1637 N 1
SFX 1637 0 NameTake .

SFX 1638 N 1
SFX 1638 0 naric .

SFX 1639 N 1
SFX 1639 0 NaturalLanguage .

SFX 1640 N 1
SFX 1640 0 NC .

SFX 1641 N 1
SFX 1641 0 ND .

SFX 1642 N 1
SFX 1642 0 Nearest .

SFX 1643 N 1
SFX 1643 0 NearestFunction .

SFX 1644 N 1
SFX 1644 0 Neighbor .

SFX 1645 N 1
SFX 1645 0 NeighborDegree .

SFX 1646 N 1
SFX 1646 0 NeighborGraph .

SFX 1647 N 1
SFX 1647 0 nel .

SFX 1648 N 1
SFX 1648 0 ness .

SFX 1649 N 1
SFX 1649 0 nessCentrality .

SFX 1650 N 1
SFX 1650 0 Net .

SFX 1651 N 1
SFX 1651 0 NewCellStyle .

SFX 1652 N 1
SFX 1652 0 NewerQ .

SFX 1653 N 1
SFX 1653 0 NewInlineCellStyle .

SFX 1654 N 1
SFX 1654 0 newton .

SFX 1655 N 1
SFX 1655 0 Newton .

SFX 1656 N 1
SFX 1656 0 newtons .

SFX 1657 N 1
SFX 1657 0 ng .

SFX 1658 N 1
SFX 1658 0 ngs .

SFX 1659 N 1
SFX 1659 0 ngwah .

SFX 1660 N 1
SFX 1660 0 ngwahs .

SFX 1661 N 1
SFX 1661 0 nian .

SFX 1662 N 1
SFX 1662 0 NightTerminator .

SFX 1663 N 1
SFX 1663 0 ning .

SFX 1664 N 1
SFX 1664 0 ningCharacters .

SFX 1665 N 1
SFX 1665 0 ningVectorsQ .

SFX 1666 N 1
SFX 1666 0 nnia .

SFX 1667 N 1
SFX 1667 0 no .

SFX 1668 N 1
SFX 1668 0 node .

SFX 1669 N 1
SFX 1669 0 nodes .

SFX 1670 N 1
SFX 1670 0 NodeSize .

SFX 1671 N 1
SFX 1671 0 NoiseProcess .

SFX 1672 N 1
SFX 1672 0 nomial .

SFX 1673 N 1
SFX 1673 0 Norm .

SFX 1674 N 1
SFX 1674 0 normal .

SFX 1675 N 1
SFX 1675 0 NormalForm .

SFX 1676 N 1
SFX 1676 0 NortonGroupHN .

SFX 1677 N 1
SFX 1677 0 Notation .

SFX 1678 N 1
SFX 1678 0 Note .

SFX 1679 N 1
SFX 1679 0 Notebook .

SFX 1680 N 1
SFX 1680 0 ns .

SFX 1681 N 1
SFX 1681 0 NS .

SFX 1682 N 1
SFX 1682 0 nTransform .

SFX 1683 N 1
SFX 1683 0 Null .

SFX 1684 N 1
SFX 1684 0 NullSequence .

SFX 1685 N 1
SFX 1685 0 Number .

SFX 1686 N 1
SFX 1686 0 NumberAbort .

SFX 1687 N 1
SFX 1687 0 NumberQ .

SFX 1688 N 1
SFX 1688 0 NuttallWindow .

SFX 1689 N 1
SFX 1689 0 o .

SFX 1690 N 1
SFX 1690 0 Object .

SFX 1691 N 1
SFX 1691 0 ObjectQ .

SFX 1692 N 1
SFX 1692 0 Objects .

SFX 1693 N 1
SFX 1693 0 ochemistryElements .

SFX 1694 N 1
SFX 1694 0 Ochre .

SFX 1695 N 1
SFX 1695 0 OfCompositions .

SFX 1696 N 1
SFX 1696 0 OfDerangements .

SFX 1697 N 1
SFX 1697 0 OfEdges .

SFX 1698 N 1
SFX 1698 0 off .

SFX 1699 N 1
SFX 1699 0 Off .

SFX 1700 N 1
SFX 1700 0 OfFaces .

SFX 1701 N 1
SFX 1701 0 Offset .

SFX 1702 N 1
SFX 1702 0 OfInvolutions .

SFX 1703 N 1
SFX 1703 0 OfPartitions .

SFX 1704 N 1
SFX 1704 0 OfPermutationsByCycles .

SFX 1705 N 1
SFX 1705 0 OfSampleMean .

SFX 1706 N 1
SFX 1706 0 OfSpanningTrees .

SFX 1707 N 1
SFX 1707 0 OfTableaux .

SFX 1708 N 1
SFX 1708 0 OfUnityQ .

SFX 1709 N 1
SFX 1709 0 OfVariation .

SFX 1710 N 1
SFX 1710 0 OfVertices .

SFX 1711 N 1
SFX 1711 0 OfWeek .

SFX 1712 N 1
SFX 1712 0 ohedral .

SFX 1713 N 1
SFX 1713 0 ohedron .

SFX 1714 N 1
SFX 1714 0 ohm .

SFX 1715 N 1
SFX 1715 0 ohms .

SFX 1716 N 1
SFX 1716 0 oid .

SFX 1717 N 1
SFX 1717 0 olute .

SFX 1718 N 1
SFX 1718 0 On .

SFX 1719 N 1
SFX 1719 0 ondun .

SFX 1720 N 1
SFX 1720 0 onduns .

SFX 1721 N 1
SFX 1721 0 one .

SFX 1722 N 1
SFX 1722 0 onen .

SFX 1723 N 1
SFX 1723 0 onent .

SFX 1724 N 1
SFX 1724 0 onentFunction .

SFX 1725 N 1
SFX 1725 0 onentialDistribution .

SFX 1726 N 1
SFX 1726 0 onentialFamily .

SFX 1727 N 1
SFX 1727 0 onentialGeneratingFunction .

SFX 1728 N 1
SFX 1728 0 onentialGeneratingFunctionConstants .

SFX 1729 N 1
SFX 1729 0 onentialMovingAverage .

SFX 1730 N 1
SFX 1730 0 onentialPowerDistribution .

SFX 1731 N 1
SFX 1731 0 onentialPowerSum .

SFX 1732 N 1
SFX 1732 0 Opacity .

SFX 1733 N 1
SFX 1733 0 Open .

SFX 1734 N 1
SFX 1734 0 Options .

SFX 1735 N 1
SFX 1735 0 or .

SFX 1736 N 1
SFX 1736 0 Orchid .
