Contents/Resources/Wolfram Player.app/Contents/SystemFiles/Components/SpellingData/SpellingDictionaries/TechTerms.dic
AdjustmentBox/1734
AlgebraicNumber/611,1673,1829,2270
Alignment/1547,1821
Annotation/608,1632,1989,2324
Antihermitian/1563,1869
BayesianMaximization/1690
BayesianMinimization/1690
Bolza/1667
Brun/1623,1661
Callout/1547
Catalan/1685
Champernowne/1685
Chern/1698
CityDistance/1588
ClassifierMeasurements/1690
coaxal/1716
coker/1647
Context/1579,1797,1994,2250,2251
ConversionRules/1624
CounterStyle/1580
Diamond/1558
DigitBlock/1590
Directory/1624,1869,2119
Disk/352,1558,2021
ErrorBox/1734
Evaluator/1632
ExternalFunction/1624
FormBox/1734
FractionBox/1734
Frobenius/1685,2090
Gompertz/1540
Hadamard/1558
Harada/1676
Hermitian/1563
hyperfinite/1534
Hyphenation/1734
Identity/1558
kerat/1716,1994
Kerze/1623
Ket/1722
kilobar/1623,1680,1994,2396,2398
Latitude/1529
LearningRate/1622
Levenberg/1551
Lieb/1543
LineBox/1734
LineIndent/1564
megabar/1623,1680,1994,2396,2398
Menger/1583
microbar/1623,1680,1994
mille/1666
Module/1685
Moebius/1619,2135
Month/1624
NamespaceBox/1734
nanobar/1623,1680,1994
parasa/1657,1658,1757
pari/1638
Philo/1623
Plus/1595
PrimeQ/419,420,1585
PrismBox/1734
pseudorandom/1534
Purple/1573
RadicalBox/1734
Rado/1623,1682
Repeated/1683,2088,2132,2239
RotationBox/1734
Schoute/1623
semiabs/1717
semilocal/1534
senti/1599,1617
Simplex/1572
siriusweite/1623
spira/1523
SpringGreen/1573
Sqrt/352,363,1600
Stere/1693
tac/1668,1669,1820,2245
TagBox/1678,1734
tala/1659,1660
TemplateBox/1734
TestReport/1690
tetrahedra/1521
Thick/1648
Thin/1663
Thue/1616
Toeplitz/1558
unate/1648
unze/1623
Version/1685,1686
VioletRed/1573,1782
White/1671,1821,2064
Whittaker/1536,2351
$CloudVersion/1685
$Path/1633
$Version/1685
